Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3809
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Act shall not be construed:

(1) As altering the provisions of any other act or acts dealing with the marketing of agricultural products or as detracting from the authorities provided for in any such acts;

(2) As empowering the department to require cooperative marketing efforts of persons or groups within any segment of the agriculture industry, but shall be construed only to authorize such cooperative marketing efforts; or

(3) As empowering the department to purchase or otherwise obtain agricultural products or commodities for the purpose of resale.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 807, § 5.